Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.17
Purchases by Nebraska Investment Finance Authority; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases made by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 47.

Nebraska Investment Finance Authority, see section 58-226.